Delaware, session 153, HB414.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 1444, Title 11 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 1444. Possessing a destructive weapon; class E felony. (d) The Superior Court has exclusive jurisdiction over offenses an offense under this section. section committed by an adult.